Utah statutes.
4-24-3.   Department authorized to make and enforce rules.
The department is authorized, subject to Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah
Administrative Rulemaking Act, to make and enforce such rules as in its
judgment are necessary to administer and enforce this chapter.
